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DTC C 1241 / 41 IGPowerSourceCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1241 / 41

Detectionofanyofconditions ( 1) through(4):
(1)Vehiclespeed is3km/h ( 1.9mph)ormoreand

voltage of ECU terminal IG remains at below 9.5 V for
more than 10secs.

(2) While the condition that the solenoid relay is ON
continues,ECUterminal IG 1 voltagebecomes9.5V
or less, and the condition that the contact point of the
solenoid relay is OFF continues for 0.2 secs. or more.

(3)Thecondition thatECUterminal IG 1 voltage ismore
than 18.5Vcontinues.

(4) While the solenoid relay outputs ON signal, ECU
terminal IG 1 voltagebecomes9.5 − 18.5V,and
the condition that the contact point of the solenoid
relay is OFF continues for 0.2 secs. or more.

SBattery
S IC regulator
SPowersourcecircuit

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the power source circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohibits
ABS control and the brake system becomes normal.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkbatteryvoltage.

OK:
Voltage: 10 − 14 V

NG Check and repair the charging system.

OK

2 Check voltage of the ECU IG power source.

INCASEOFUSINGHAND −HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check thevoltageconditionoutput fromtheECUdisplayedon thehand −held tester.
OK:

”Normal” is displayed.

INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND −HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
RemoveABSECUwithconnectorsstill connected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b)Measurevoltagebetween terminals IG 1 andGNDofABS

ECU connector.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

OK Ignition switch OFF, check and replace ABS
ECU.

NG
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3 Check continuity between terminal GND of ABS ECU connector and body
ground.

CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal GND of ABS ECU con-
nector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 � or less

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

4 Check ECU−IG fuse.

PREPARATION:
Remove ECU−IG fuse from driver ’s side J/B.
CHECK:
Check continuity of ECU−IG fuse.
OK:

Continuity

NG Check for short circuit in all the harness and
components connected to ECU−IG fuse (See at-
tached wiring diagram).

OK

Check for open circuit in harness and connector between ABS ECU and battery.
(See page IN−24)


